Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3
F

OREST FIRE PREVENTION AND CONTROL

Cross references.

- Southeastern Interstate Forest Fire Protection Compact,

§

12-10-60

et seq.

Burning of woodlands, brush, fields, or other lands; destruction of or damage to material or device used in detection or suppression of wildfires; penalties for violations,

§

16-7-63

.

12-6-80. Short title.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the "Georgia Forest Fire Protection Act."

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 6, § 12.)

12-6-81. Legislative purpose.

The General Assembly, recognizing that the forest lands and resources of the state are a natural resource of great economic value to the citizens of the state, comprising two-thirds of the state's area, or 24 million acres, and giving employment to over 177,000 Georgia citizens and bringing to the state a $19.5 billion economic impact; that uncontrolled forest fires threaten not only lands on which they occur, but also the health of the lands and the citizens of the state; that the present and potential production of forest products are materially menaced and reduced through recurring uncontrolled forest fires, thereby resulting in loss to owners of forest lands, industries, workers, and communities; that it is of vital importance to the state to protect and develop forest lands for the continuous production of forest products; and that this cannot be accomplished without organized and coordinated state-wide protection, declares that protection against uncontrolled fire and preservation of the forest lands and forest resources of the state are essential for the economic welfare of the state and its people and further declares that prescribed burning is an effective method of reducing fuel loads and the potential hazards and impact associated with uncontrolled fires.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 1.)

12-6-82. Definitions.

As used in this part, the term:

"Forest fire" means any fire burning uncontrolled on any forest land covered wholly or in part by timber, brush, grass, or other flammable material.

"Forest lands" means all lands which are situated outside of corporate limits and which have enough forest growth, either standing or down, or have sufficient flammable debris or grass, to constitute, in the judgment of the State Forestry Commission, a menace to such lands or adjoining lands.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, §§ 7, 8.)

12-6-83. Direction and supervision by State Forestry Commission of forest fire protection work; making and enforcing rules and regulations.

All forest fire protection work shall be under the direction and supervision of the State Forestry Commission, through the director of the commission, subject to this part and the laws of this state relative to forestry and forest fire prevention and suppression. The commission shall have power to make and enforce all rules and regulations necessary for the administration of forest fire protection.

(Ga. L. 1925, p. 199, § 3; Ga. L. 1931, p. 7, § 21; Code 1933, § 43-206; Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 4.)

12-6-84. Entry upon land for fire-prevention purposes or investigations.

The members of the State Forestry Commission and any of its authorized agents or anyone acting at their direction shall have the right at any or all times to go upon any land for the purpose of preventing, controlling, or suppressing forest fires, as defined in Code Section 12-6-82, or for the purpose of making investigations, without incurring liability for trespassing.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 13; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 33.)

Cross references.

- Right of organized fire suppression force to suppress nuisance as constituted by uncontrolled fire on forested or cut-over brush land or grassland,

§

12-6-21

.

Authority of commission to enter upon lands to investigate, suppress, and control tree diseases or insect infestation,

§

12-6-22

.

12-6-85. Fire protection units.

The State Forestry Commission shall divide the state into fire protection units which will provide efficient and economical fire protection within the unit area. Such units will comprise one or more counties or portions of counties.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 9.)

12-6-86. Unit forestry boards - Creation; appointment; qualifications; terms of office; vacancies; service by members without compensation.

In the discretion of the State Forestry Commission, there may be set up in each fire protection unit a board to be known as the unit forestry board, consisting of five members who shall be appointed by the State Forestry Commission.

The State Forestry Commission shall determine the number of members from each county within the fire protection unit to be appointed to the board in accordance with the percentage of forest land acreage for each county within the unit.

The members of the board shall be residents of the county from which they are appointed and shall be owners of forest land or representatives of such owners. Change of residence from the county shall terminate the appointment.

The initial term of the members of all of the unit forestry boards shall be one member for one year, one member for two years, one member for three years, one member for four years, and one member for five years, each member holding office until his successor is appointed. After the expiration of the first term, one member shall be appointed annually for a term of five years.

In case of a vacancy on the unit forestry board by reason of death, resignation, or otherwise, such vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired term in the same manner as provided for the appointment of members thereof.

The members of the unit forestry boards shall serve without compensation.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 10; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 36.)

12-6-87. Unit forestry boards - Duties.

The duties of the unit forestry board shall be to assist in the efficient performance of this part and in the general conduct of the forestry program in the fire protection unit.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 11.)

12-6-88. Unit forestry boards - Annual forest fire protection plans appropriation of funds for public information campaign.

The State Forestry Commission shall prepare for each unit forestry board a plan for forest fire protection for the fiscal year and shall present such plan at a meeting of the board prior to July 1 of each year. It is the intent of the General Assembly that funds be appropriated to the State Forestry Commission each year to provide a public information campaign as provided in Code Section 12-6-149 and for prescribed fire training throughout the state.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 12; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 2.)

12-6-89. "Extreme forest fire emergency" defined; authority of Governor, forestry investigators, and peace officers in emergency; advice by director to Governor as to existence of emergency.

As used in this Code section, "extreme forest fire emergency" means a condition whereby forest fires within the state are of such number, size, severity, and intensity that they cannot be controlled by the existing facilities of the State Forestry Commission and are endangering life and property.

The Governor shall have authority to declare and determine the existence and termination of such emergency and, by order, rule, or regulation, to prohibit hunting, fishing, camping, or picnicking in any woods or lands of the state, or to prohibit the entering of such woods or lands for any other purposes which might cause a fire hazard or endanger the life or property of any person within such area. The Governor may direct and commandeer all state agencies and personnel to assist the State Forestry Commission in such emergency by executive order.

Forestry investigators and any and all other peace officers of this state, or of any county or municipality thereof, shall have authority to make arrests for violation of any order, rule, or regulation made pursuant to a declaration of extreme forest fire emergency. Any person who violates any such order, rule, or regulation shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

The director of the State Forestry Commission will notify the Governor from time to time what situation, in his judgment, constitutes an extreme forest fire emergency.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 968; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, §§ 37, 38; Ga. L. 1959, p. 72, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Emergency powers of Governor generally,

§§

38-3-22

,

38-3-51

,

45-12-29

et seq.

12-6-90. Permit required for burning woods, lands, marshes, or other flammable vegetation; exceptions.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section, any person, firm, corporation, or association lawfully entitled to burn any woods, lands, marshes, or any other flammable vegetation, whether in cultivated or uncultivated areas, shall prior to such burning obtain a permit therefor from the forest ranger of the county wherein such burning is to be made or from another employee of the forestry unit serving such county who is authorized by the chief forester of such unit to grant such permits. An applicant for a permit shall provide the county forest ranger or other authorized employee of the forestry unit serving the county with the location and the recommended time of the proposed burn. Such information may be provided and the permit may be obtained by a telephone call to the county forest ranger or to another authorized employee of the forestry unit serving the county. The permit shall be given by providing the applicant therefor with a permit number which will grant permission for a controlled burn to take place at the location specified by the applicant at a time approved by the county forest ranger or by the other authorized employee of the forestry unit serving the county.

It shall not be necessary to obtain a permit otherwise required by subsection (a) of this Code section if a sudden emergency requires a firing in order to render one's premises safe. In any prosecution under this Code section, a necessary firing in a sudden emergency shall constitute an affirmative defense, but the burden of proving such necessity shall rest upon the person asserting it as a defense.

It shall not be necessary to obtain a permit otherwise required by subsection (a) of this Code section to burn improved pastures, residue on cultivated crop land, or leaf piles if the person, firm, corporation, or association intending to burn such residue shall, prior to such burning, give notice of the approximate time and location thereof to the forest ranger of the county wherein such burning is to be made or to an employee of the forestry unit serving such county who is authorized to grant permits under subsection (a) of this Code section.

The notice or permit required by this Code section shall be in addition to any other notice or permit or other requirement for burning provided for by law or by ordinance, resolution, or regulation of any county or municipality of this state; provided, however, that no additional restrictions provided by local ordinance shall prohibit burning the understory for the health of the forest and wildlife or prohibit the landowner's ability to reduce fuel loads on the forest floor for the safety of the community; provided, further, that the foregoing exception shall not apply to the burning of leaf or brush piles not necessary to accomplish the purposes of prescribed burning.

Any person who fails to give any notice required by subsection (c) of this Code section or who makes a burn described by subsection (a) of this Code section without obtaining the permit required by said subsection shall be guilty of a misdemeanor.

(Ga. L. 1956, p. 382, §§ 1-3; Ga. L. 1981, p. 895, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 477, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1285, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12.)

Cross references.

- Burning of woodlands, brush, fields, or other lands; destruction of or damage to material or device used in detection or suppression of wildfires; penalties for violations,

§

16-7-63

.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, "foregoing" was substituted for "forgoing" near the end of subsection (d).

12-6-91. Controlled burning by owners over own forest land.

Unless prohibited by the director of the State Forestry Commission pursuant to the provisions of Code Section 12-6-17, the owners of any forest land may accomplish controlled burning over their own land when a permit therefor is obtained pursuant to the requirements of Code Section 12-6-90 and the fire is not allowed to spread onto or over the land of another or others.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 15; Ga. L. 1988, p. 477, § 2.)

Cross references.

- Burning of woodlands, brush, fields, or other lands; destruction of or damage to material or device used in detection or suppression of wildfires; penalties for violations,

§

16-7-63

.

12-6-92. Vesting of title to property in State Forestry Commission.

The title to all property already acquired or which may be acquired incidental to carrying out this part shall be vested in the State Forestry Commission.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 14.)

12-6-93. Appropriations; agreements between State Forestry Commission and counties; taxation by counties for fire protection.

The funds required to carry out this part and provide for the coordinated protection of uncontrolled fire on all forest lands in the State of Georgia may be provided from annual appropriations made by the General Assembly for this purpose.

In the event any county desires forest fire protection, the county shall enter into an agreement with the State Forestry Commission, and such agreement shall provide for the payment to the commission of an amount reasonably related to the actual cost of providing forest fire protection. Such amount shall be calculated per forest acre of privately owned forest land. Forest acres of privately owned land shall be based upon the most recent United States Forest Service survey for Georgia.

Any agreement in existence on July 1, 2010, between a county and the commission providing for a different percentage or amount of payment shall be changed so as to provide for the payment of an amount reasonably related to the actual cost of providing forest fire protection. Such amount shall be calculated per forest acre.

Any county may levy a tax to provide the additional funds required for fire protection under this part.

(Ga. L. 1949, p. 937, § 3; Ga. L. 1950, p. 101, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 309, § 34; Ga. L. 1967, p. 29, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 9, § 1-33/HB 1055.)

Cross references.

- Purposes for which counties may exercise power of taxation, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. IX, Sec. IV, Para. I-III.